Hawaii, session 2026, GM1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that timely and accurate
determination of an injured worker's physical abilities and
functional restrictions is essential to ensure fair treatment
under the workers' compensation system. Functional capacity
examinations play a critical role in assessing whether an
injured worker can return to work, with or without
accommodations, or proceed with vocational rehabilitation when
returning to full duty is not possible. However, the current
system often delays functional capacity examinations due to
denials or pending approvals from insurers or adjusters, thereby
prolonging the injured worker's path to recovery and return to
work. These delays exacerbate financial and emotional strain on
workers, increase administrative inefficiencies, and impede the
progress of vocational rehabilitation programs.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to streamline the
approval process for functional capacity examinations, ensuring
automatic approval of the examinations when requested by the
2026-3317 HB1515 GDI HMSO
iniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
attending physician under certain conditions, thereby reducing
unnecessary delays and improving outcomes for injured workers.
SECTION 2. Chapter 386, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§386- Functional capacity examination. (a) When an
injured employee's attending physician has determined that the
employee has reached medical stabilization and the employee's
capacity to work is in question, the attending physician may
request a functional capacity examination to be performed by a
qualified health care provider whose opinion or advice is
necessary in the evaluation and treatment of the injured
employee's injury; provided that:
(1) The qualified health care provider shall be trained to
perform a functional capacity examination; and
(2) The attending physician shall not be required to
obtain permission from the employer before requesting
a functional capacity examination or referring the
injured employee for a functional capacity
examination.
2026-3317 HB1515 CDl HMSO

IIIIIIBMIlilMlliiin

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) The name, business address, discipline^ and specialty
of the qualified health care provider and reasons for the
functional capacity examination shall be submitted in writing to
the employer at least seven calendar days before the referral.
(c) The qualified health care provider performing the
functional capacity examination shall provide a copy of the
functional capacity examination report to the attending
physician and employer no later than fourteen calendar days
after the date of the examination.
(d) Fees for functional capacity examinations requested by
the attending physician pursuant to this section shall be paid
by the employer.
(e) As used in this section:
"Functional capacity examination" means a set of tests that
are used to identify an injured employee's physical skills,
functional capabilities, activity endurance, and work tolerances
after reaching medical stabilization.
"Functional capacity examination report" means a report
issued by a qualified health care provider that provides
recommendations regarding an injured employee's ability to
return to work with or without restrictions or the need for
2026-3317 HB1515 CDl HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
accommodations to safely return to work based on a functional
capacity examination performed on the injured employee.
"Qualified health care provider" means a health care
provider who meets the qualifications under section 386-27 to
render health care and services under this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 386-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "health care provider" to
read as follows:
""Health care provider" means a person qualified by the
director to render health care and service and who has a license
for the practice of:
(1) Medicine or [os-tcopathy] osteopathic medicine under
chapter 453;
(2) Dentistry under chapter 448;
(3) Chiropractic under chapter 442;
(4) Naturopathic medicine under chapter 455;
(5) Optometry under chapter 459;
(6) Podiatry under chapter 463E;
(7) Psychology under chapter 465; [and]
(8) Advanced practice registered nurse under chapter
457 [-^] ; and
2026-3317 HB1515 CDl HMSO
lllllllillinilHHMHI

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(9) Occupational therapy under chapter 457G or physical
therapy under chapter 461J; provided that occupational
therapists and physical therapists qualified under
section 386-27 shall be qualified for the limited
purpose of performing functional capacity examinations
pursuant to section 386-
SECTION 4. Section 386-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) All health care providers rendering health care and
services under this chapter shall [be qualified by the director
and shall] remain qualified by satisfying the requirements
established in this section. The director shall qualify any
person initially who has a license for the practice of:
(1) Medicine or [ootcopath-y] osteopathic medicine under
chapter 453;
(2) Dentistry under chapter 448;
(3) Chiropractic under chapter 442;
(4) Naturopathic medicine under chapter 455;
(5) Optometry under chapter 459;
(6) Podiatry under chapter 463E;
(7) Psychology under chapter 465; [and]
2026-3317 HB1515 CDl HMSO
iniiiiiiiniwiioiin

Page 6 H.B. NO 1515
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(8) Advanced practice registered nurse under
chapter 457[—j; and
(9) Occupational therapy under chapter 457G or physical
therapy under chapter 461J; provided that occupational
therapists and physical therapists qualified under
this section shall be qualified for the limited
purpose of performing functional capacity examinations
pursuant to section 386-
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored,
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3317 HB1515 CDl HMSO
MimMiiiinnwB

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1515, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1515, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
34-26